Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.330

Interest arbitration panel—State agency designation.

An interest arbitration panel created pursuant to RCW 41.80.320, in the performance of its duties under this chapter, exercises a state function and is, for the purposes of this chapter, a state agency. Chapter 34.05 RCW does not apply to proceedings before an interest arbitration panel under this chapter.

[ 2019 c 234 s 6.]